Utah statutes.
76-10-602.   Use of person's name without consent for soliciting contribution prohibited -- Exception.

No charitable organization, professional fund raiser, or professional solicitor, seeking to raise funds for charitable purposes, shall use the name of any other person for the purpose of soliciting contributions, in this state, without the written consent of the person; provided that this section shall not apply to religious corporations or organizations, charities, agencies, and organizations operated, supervised, or controlled by or in connection with a religious corporation or organization.



Enacted by Chapter 196, 1973 General Session

